 
 
FALLUJAH murder pictures...GRAPHIC(democrats and whiney-assed liberals beware)
 
 
 http://www.homestead.com/prosites-pr...res033104.html 

Why do the US newsgroups hide reality from US citizens? Are they afraid that we will see what really happens in the world and upset the poor, sensitive, Democratic morons that would prefer we stay disjointed as a nation? Are they afraid we might start forming different opinions about things? The rest of the world is not "sheltered", why are we?

While we are in Iraq, having freed them from a dictator, one would think that the people would want to do all they could to assit us in setting up their country. When an atrocity like this happens, one would think that maybe the local poplulace would assist in the capture of the perpetrators, but the following quote seems to say otherwise.

""Muslims must not denounce other Muslims," militant Sheikh Omar Bakri Muhammad told the British Broadcasting Corporation. "Cooperation with the authorities against other Muslims, that is an act of apostasy."

 http://www.washingtontimes.com/upi-b...2817-2005r.htm 

So, since we cannot expect any help from the locals, maybe we need to escalate our tactics.

I think such acts might make us want to follow Gen Blackjack Pershing's policy of giving every terrorist a free burial, along with a pig carcass to keep him company in the hereafter!!!
 
 
See... this is where I differ from the norm. Civilian casualties, my ass. Bomb the hell outta that entire city.

Kill 'em all, and let Allah sort them out.
 
 
 
Originally posted by lilcountriegal
See... this is where I differ from the norm. Civilian casualties, my ass. Bomb the hell outta that entire city.

Kill 'em all, and let Allah sort them out.

 

You are NOT being very sensitive to their cultural need to "kill the infidel" m'lady!!!!! John Kerry and the rest of the tear-jerking democraps would not like that attitude; you are NOT being politically correct.
 
 
Politically correct, my ass.

I let them off easy. Normally I would wish for a strategically placed nuke and to hell with the entire country, but I'm too worried about the fallout. THAT would be a good day.

A GREAT day would be for John Kerry and Ted Kennedy to be visiting Iraq when it hit.

 
 
 
And, as a quick P.S., my only wish is WHEN we handle this situation, I hope to hell someone takes pictures of there burned out scorched bodies hanging from the same damn bridge.
 
 
We maintain a psychological warfare section of the U.S. Army, why can't they just make sure pictures are distributed all over Iraq showing terrorists being buried with a pig?

Because it is not politically correct and would be culturally insensitive...BullSh*t!!!!! We weren't being culturally sensitive when we killed 70,000 civilians at Hiroshima or politically correct when we fire-bombed 100,000 civilians to death at Dresden.

This isn't a kid's game of marbles, it's war. Play it hard and play it for keeps.
 
 
it's really kind of amazing to listen to this past age old philosphy in current motion. a perpetuation of an imposed violence, and one of quesitonable intent. given the circumstances, you can't really be suprised by something as horrific as this to happen? you don't even see our guys being blown to bits on a practically everyday basis!

this immense sudden hatred from the (mostly) war proponents is invariably telling about true intent of the occupation of iraq. i support a stronger international prescence in iraq for the greater of all the HUMANS in the area.

face it, our troops spend most of their time around the bases, largely due to the threat of agression! without a larger international presence and a saturation of the area with MORE prospecting contractors, and more emphasis on really rebuilding the country, this situation will continue into a tailspin as many predicted.

i'm not sure how we can do that or if it's even possible, but to assimilate a region you need to saturate it. with such a scant effort of mostly US troops, it's unlikely anything we hope for would take hold.

but I AM SURE where your hatred will get you. NOWHERE.
 
 
"i support a stronger international prescence in iraq for the greater of all the HUMANS in the area." (quote spillmind)

And I say, we have given them their freedom so we should do one of two things:
1) Assist them with recreating their infrastructure so they may do something with it, in exchange for cheap oil for us.

or

2) Pull out and let them fend for themselves. If they do not care enough to maintain their freedom, they do not deserve it.
 
 
 
Originally posted by AtlantaWalter
 http://www.homestead.com/prosites-pr...res033104.html 

While we are in Iraq, having freed them from a dictator...

[

 

An influential Shiite Muslim cleric whose newspaper was shuttered for printing inflammatory articles called Friday for his followers to strike back at officials and appointees of the U.S.-led occupation authority.

"I and my followers of the believers have come under attack from the occupiers, imperialism and the appointees," Moqtada Sadr said in a sermon in the southern town of Kufa, outside the holy city of Najaf. "Be on the utmost readiness, and strike them where you meet them."

On Friday evening, clashes erupted....

Speaks for itself.
 
 
 
Originally posted by st8_o_mind
An influential Shiite Muslim cleric whose newspaper was shuttered for printing inflammatory articles called Friday for his followers to strike back at officials and appointees of the U.S.-led occupation authority.

"I and my followers of the believers have come under attack from the occupiers, imperialism and the appointees," Moqtada Sadr said in a sermon in the southern town of Kufa, outside the holy city of Najaf. "Be on the utmost readiness, and strike them where you meet them."

On Friday evening, clashes erupted....

Speaks for itself.

 

my bad. The above was not referenced. It is from today's Washington Post available online at:  http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn...-2004Apr2.html 
 
 
 
Originally posted by lilcountriegal
Politically correct, my ass.

I let them off easy. Normally I would wish for a strategically placed nuke and to hell with the entire country, but I'm too worried about the fallout. THAT would be a good day.

A GREAT day would be for John Kerry and Ted Kennedy to be visiting Iraq when it hit.

 

 

This crap is very disturbing to me. I am hopeful that it is a reflection of adolescent bravado, not a serious attempt to advocate mass murder in retaliation of the brutal deaths of four Americans.

It never ceases to amaze me that the right-wing recoils in moral outrage at the concept of gay marriage, yet they are so completely morally bankrupt that calls to incinerate tens of thousands of innocent human beings is considered neither disgusting or perverse but cheered as patriotic.

It is likely that “Thou shall not kill” means little to the writer who clearly has no moral compass whatsoever. It is obvious to me that to advocate such mass violence and murder against the innocent no matter how just he or she feels their cause is, put the writer on exactly the same moral plane as the suicide bombers and 9/11 hijackers.

Such vile calls for mass murder should be condemned and denounced for what it is: Terrorism.
 
 
Is it not now completely obvious to everyone from the last posts from Spillmind and ST8 that they are Iraqi sympathizers and unAmerican? Yeah I said it, if you can't get behind our effort and have some outrage at this kind of animalistic act then maybe you don't deserve or should partake in the other things that America offers.

Why should America play by a certain set of rules when the enemy does not play by the same? I say the time has come for carpet bombing and village burning until the citizens decide to give up whoever is behind this and all the other murders taking place. If they still decide not to after all that we loot the country of oil, leave and let them all die in a brutal civil war.

The people must be seriously uneducated and animals if they thought that killing some engineers were going to further their cause **sigh**
 
 
 
Originally posted by st8_o_mind
It never ceases to amaze me that the right-wing recoils in moral outrage at the concept of gay marriage, yet they are so completely morally bankrupt that calls to incinerate tens of thousands of innocent human beings is considered neither disgusting or perverse but cheered as patriotic.

 

Yes, let's pick on just the right.

Over 60% of the nation is against gay marriage.
Nearly 55% of the nation supports the war in Iraq.

Do the math, if you can.
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA
Is it not now completely obvious to everyone from the last posts from Spillmind and ST8 that they are Iraqi sympathizers and unAmerican? Yeah I said it, if you can't get behind our effort and have some outrage at this kind of animalistic act then maybe you don't deserve or should partake in the other things that America offers.

 

    You crack me up. And all this time I thought Joe McCarthy was dead!

I would suggest that "now completely obvious to everyone" that YOU are the unamerican one. You trample on some of the most important pillars of US society. You want free speech without debate. You want a free press without dissent. You proclaim to support democracy but without the free exchange of ideas and critical examination of policy that is the foundation of democratic government. Perhaps you should go back to whatever communist dictatorship that you came from where the government controls the media and arrests those that dissent from the official government policy. Damn Commie.
 
 
 
Is it not now completely obvious to everyone from the last posts from Spillmind and ST8 that they are Iraqi sympathizers and unAmerican?

 

damn, what a SAD attempt. if i didn't GIVE A SHIT FOR OUR COUNTRY, why in the hell would i waste time posting here?   get a clue!

 
if you can't get behind our effort and have some outrage

 

..then it means i am not such a SIMPLETON as to have knee-jerk reactions that do NOTHING but channel hatred. it won't even make anybody's situation better, GET IT YET?

 
If they still decide not to after all that we loot the country of oil, leave and let them all die in a brutal civil war.

 

and it should now become obvious to everyone where YOUR priorities lie. humanitarian my ass. wolf in sheep's clothing, anybody? what a joke!  

 
Over 60% of the nation is against gay marriage. Nearly 55% of the nation supports the war in Iraq.

 

and what percentage of them STILL think that iraq was directly linked or even responsible for 9/11? that's some esteemed company there!   i've noticed all these people these boards who touted the iraqi liberation and talking about how many more rights they now have- ready to kill one if they ever actually SAW one! this 180° shift is indictive of FLIP FLOPPING on the TRUE INTENT of being there. way to show your true colors, guys!  
 
 
I must admit,these pictures made me a even more angry than I was!!! IMO,you have to kick a$$ and take no names with these people. What in the world is a U.N presence going to do. More of a worldwide coaltion is going to make these a$$wipes stop their ridiculous behavior? I don't think so. So,we put more countries in,is that going to make them say"oh France is here now,let's stop killing innocent civilians,Americans,and Jews because now there is a worldwide caolition"? Hardly. They are irrational,and there is only one way to deal with them. No talking,no reasoning,just beating them down until they run like the chickens they are or are killed. A more worldwide coalition will do absolutely nothing,but make these idiots kill people from even more countries. They have no regard for life and are a pain in everyone's a$$. Wipe em out however needed. That is the only way to stop em.
 
 
 
Originally posted by st8_o_mind
    You crack me up. And all this time I thought Joe McCarthy was dead!

I would suggest that "now completely obvious to everyone" that YOU are the unamerican one. You trample on some of the most important pillars of US society. You want free speech without debate. You want a free press without dissent. You proclaim to support democracy but without the free exchange of ideas and critical examination of policy that is the foundation of democratic government. Perhaps you should go back to whatever communist dictatorship that you came from where the government controls the media and arrests those that dissent from the official government policy. Damn Commie.

 

"it is obvious to me that to advocate such mass violence and murder against the INNOCENT"

Its right their in your own words moron, your pathetic attempt at trying to make a simple murder lynching into some sort of vindicated expression of outrage against American forces, INNOCENT MY ASS! i'll tell you what I saw, I saw a gang of people out their celebrating deaths of innocent engineers. Why do you insist on playing by some stupid set of rules in this war and excusing the behavior of animals? We must play by their rules and become as violent as they are. You call me commie just because I don't go along with your socialist utopian views of the world. Your guilt over betraying your country is making you irrational. Please find a quote where I advocated arrest of dissenters and wanted to squash the free press. Since you will be unable to find that please print a retraction.
 
 
Whoa fellas (and ladies).
We're all on the same team, remember?
We can't decide foreign policy here, as nice as it might be.
To retaliate or not, that is the question, and in what way?
Although a nuclear bomb seems a bit harsh and way too un-PC for certain US groups, doesn't it seem reasonable to drop leaflets warning the sunni triangle to get the hell out in 48 hours, then barricade the area and drop a destrutive non-nuclear bomb? We get our point across with as few human casualties as possible. Those who ignore our warning can blame no one but themselves.
 
 
 
Originally posted by spillmind
damn, what a SAD attempt. if i didn't GIVE A SHIT FOR OUR COUNTRY, why in the hell would i waste time posting here?   get a clue!

..then it means i am not such a SIMPLETON as to have knee-jerk reactions that do NOTHING but channel hatred. it won't even make anybody's situation better, GET IT YET?

and it should now become obvious to everyone where YOUR priorities lie. humanitarian my ass. wolf in sheep's clothing, anybody? what a joke!  

and what percentage of them STILL think that iraq was directly linked or even responsible for 9/11? that's some esteemed company there!   i've noticed all these people these boards who touted the iraqi liberation and talking about how many more rights they now have- ready to kill one if they ever actually SAW one! this 180° shift is indictive of FLIP FLOPPING on the TRUE INTENT of being there. way to show your true colors, guys!  

 

You have never heard me saying that we should be engaged in a full scale humanitarian effort while there are still subhuman savages roaming the countryside.

We must first use the military for the ONLY thing its for, killing people and destroying things, we must stop fighting this war as if we give two shits what the leftist Iraqi sympathizers in our country think. Wipe out all the animals in a short but brutal consolidation of our power over the WHOLE COUNTRY and then get onto the process of rebuilding the country.

Face it, its my view or more bodybags which i'm sure won't bother the liberals as they love American deaths so they can say I told you so.

"War is hell" George S. Patton
 
 
 
Originally posted by clumzgirl
Whoa fellas (and ladies).
We're all on the same team, remember?
We can't decide foreign policy here, as nice as it might be.
To retaliate or not, that is the question, and in what way?
Although a nuclear bomb seems a bit harsh and way too un-PC for certain US groups, doesn't it seem reasonable to drop leaflets warning the sunni triangle to get the hell out in 48 hours, then barricade the area and drop a destrutive non-nuclear bomb? We get our point across with as few human casualties as possible. Those who ignore our warning can blame no one but themselves.

 

That is a thought, only thing wrong is the savages get away. Give the people there an option, give up the guerillas or lose your home and way of life. They will turn them in.
 
 
 
Originally posted by st8_o_mind
[B]     You crack me up. And all this time I thought Joe McCarthy was dead!

 

McCarthy was right.
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA
[B
Its right their in your own words moron, your pathetic attempt at trying to make a simple murder lynching into some sort of vindicated expression of outrage against American forces, INNOCENT MY ASS! [/B]

 

I can help you with your confusion, as far as your anger issues go, there you are on your own.

If you scroll up a bit you will see that I was responding to a posting that advocated nuking Iraq. It had nothing to do with excusing lynching.

If you feel that incinerating the innocent along with the perpetrators of a crime is just, then your concept of justice is as twisted and perverse as your morality.
 
 
Whiney assed liberals I think is part of the title of this thread.

People I introduce to you ST8, the quintessential specimen.

Yeah I do advocate eye for an eye and fortunately we have a president with balls who is going to do just that. There is no justice in war, war is about killing and destroying ONLY, and until you and your dubious ilk understand that you will always be on the outside looking in.
 
 
 
Originally posted by spillmind
and what percentage of them STILL think that iraq was directly linked or even responsible for 9/11? that's some esteemed company there!   i've noticed all these people these boards who touted the iraqi liberation and talking about how many more rights they now have- ready to kill one if they ever actually SAW one! this 180° shift is indictive of FLIP FLOPPING on the TRUE INTENT of being there. way to show your true colors, guys!  

 

Who said anything about 9/11? And the talk about killing people is about those responsible for dragging our people through the streets like dogs. If you ever learn to respond without making your entire post look like a comic strip you just may actually understand what people are saying, and vice versa.
 
 
What we should do in this town is exactly what we're doing throughout the War on Terror. We need to pinpoint these guys and strike them with covert operations during the middle of the night.

When Fallujah wakes up, many suspects are in custody, and a huge, overwhelming American police force is in the town.

We must get a handle on Fallujah. According to Abu Musab al-Zarqawi, once Iraq's a free country, there is no need to fight here anymore.

We have a few rough months ahead. Let's endure it!

We're the world's SUPERPOWER. We can't let mobs of bullies and thugs change the will and resolve of our core mission.
 
 
Iraq probably had nothing to do with 9/11, but Saddam still supported terrorists, he still violated war treatries (over a dozen times) and he still slaughtered his own people by means you can't even imagine.

These mobs in Fallujah are following the same ideology of the ideology of terrorism. Radicalism will be conquered by tolerance and democracy.
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA
Whiney assed liberals I think is part of the title of this thread.

People I introduce to you ST8, the quintessential specimen.

Yeah I do advocate eye for an eye and fortunately we have a president with balls who is going to do just that. There is no justice in war, war is about killing and destroying ONLY, and until you and your dubious ilk understand that you will always be on the outside looking in.

 

Somewhere between your eyes and your brain there must be a circuit that is not functioning. For the third time, I was responding to a post (not yours) that advocated nuking Fallujah. Dropping a nuclear bomb on a city has absolutely nothing to do with justice, or an “eye for an eye” as you put it. It is quite possible to support the idea of an eye for an eye without believing that incinerating thousands of children is moral or just.

Your little speech about the meaning of war was pretty entertaining. Did you get that from an old John Wayne movie or something? Small wonder you support Bush. His monumentally stupid comment to “bring ‘em on,” challenging the Iraqi’s to attack Americans fighting in Iraq was also spoken with the bravado of someone who, like you, has no first hand knowledge of war. Thanks for the lecture, but unlike you, I’ve been to Iraq on a government paid trip. I don’t need an amateur like you to tell me about war.

By the way, your point was also factually wrong. There are rules to war. Both international law including the Geneva Convention as well as US law embodied in the Uniform Code of Military Justice. Currently, US soldiers are facing court martial for abusing prisoners in Afghanistan. The military does not tolerate torture, much less illegal killing. To advocate killing civilians on a mass scale, such as nuking a city has nothing to do with the reality of war. Nor does objecting to mass murder make me a liberal. Most conservatives are against mass murder as well.

It is supremely ironic that you defend the use of weapons of mass destruction on a city of thousands of people including women, children and senior citizens when the reason Americans are there in the first place is to prevent WMD from being used. Some on these pages even point out that Saddam’s use of WMD against the Kurds is proof that he is a barbaric bastard that had to be removed. And here you are advocating do the same thing. It is just amazing. If conservatives don’t like what Saddam represents, they should reject your philosophy. I can’t find any difference between your so-called morality and Saddams.

Real American soldiers who really know about war are fighting far from home. They are our sons and daughters, mothers and fathers, brothers and sisters. You don’t represent them. They, for the most part, are decent, honorable people. You, Osama and Saddam represent a small group of extremists who defend using weapons of mass destruction to achieve their ends. There is nothing liberal about opposing your ilk. It is called patriotism.
 
 
  :clap1:  

Congratulations sweet cheeks, you are talking to somebody who has done time in a military unit(albeit in the Greek army) but still more than your taxpayer junket ass. You have no idea what you are talking about even in the remotest of terms. Yeah the military "officially" deplores these things but in practice its a much different story which you would know if you had any practical knowledge whatsoever.

I guess, well I don't guess because its painfully obvious, that you wish us to come out on the losing side in the WOT. Hey what can I say? You were brought up wrong i'm guessing but its not your fault as the liberals say.

The desperation and lack of intelligence and intestinal fortitude is painfully obvious in your writings as you've taken to equating me with Sadaam and Osama. I take that has a compliment though because it means that I have much more of an understanding of what it takes to win this thing than your spineless liberal farce of a being. In my eyes wouldn't be easier for me to equate a socialist such as yourself with Marx, Lenin and Trotsky? Maybe even Castro?
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA

Congratulations sweet cheeks, you are talking to somebody who has done time in a military unit(albeit in the Greek army)

 

Sweet cheecks.....Greek army? :rotflmao:

Well the liberals have nothing to fear from your wit. The sheep on the other hand are terrified!

:p:
 
 
Typical liberal response, attack the messenger and not the message because you have no message. None of that stuff bothers me, but what does bother me is that you are anti American all the while reaping the benefits of what this country provides. Must be the perspective of living in a shell all your life, huh?

Thanks for proving once again that libs are the problem in America.
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA
what does bother me is that you are anti American all the while reaping the benefits of what this country provides.

 

There is little, with the possible execption of of Jazz, that is more american than the belief in decency, human rights, and the dignity of individuals. Advocating mass murder to retaliate for the crimes in Fulluja is none of those.

On a personal note, you're not from Cypris or Limnos are you? It would put my mind at ease to know you are not related to my partner. Her parents hail from those islands.
 
 
Is being a complete pacifist pussy part of being an American too? I'm 100% Cretan, look up our history and find out what actual warriors are like. Cyprus and Limnos huh? Well Cyprus is under U.N. rule and thet are always whining to Greece so maybe that is rubbing off on ya.

Also dignity, human rights and dignity of individuals have little meaning when every citizen has the possibility of being strapped with explosives. But hey lets understand them, its our fault that they are forced to do these things, right? You almost make me ashamed to be an American citizen.
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA
I'm 100% Cretan.

 

Whew
 
 
American government, sheild its citizens because they don't want us to know the truth about Iraq! Americans would find out that our government motives were not honest going into Iraq.

O'Neill and Clarke have given us an inside picture of the Bush aministration for three years. The Bush administration has been so secretive and have not shared any information with its citizens. Bush has gone as far as sealing all his administration documents for 25 years before they would become declassified. Twenty-five years before we would know what went on inside of the Oval Office under the Bush administration.

It is evident that Bush and his administration were focus on Iraq coming into office. The citizens need to asked themselves did Bush undermind war on terrorism by invading Iraq?

This is what we know. Iraq was never an imminent threat to the U.S.: Iraq did not attack America on 9/11. Iraq do not have WMD. Iraq had no link to Al Qaeda. So, why are we in Iraq?

Bush has not been able to win the hearts and minds of the Iraqi people. The current violence has confirmed that more and more Iraqis are resisting the American occupation.

Iraq is so close to a civil war. There is over 25 different tribes in Iraq. The U.S. appointed Governing Council is a joke to the citizens of Iraq. The Iraqi do not acknowledge the Governing Council.

The signing of the constitution was a big deal for America. The Iraqis are refusing to be governed by the constitution. Bush and his people did not do their homework. Three major tribes that are discontended with American occupation are looking very close to see how much power will be divided among them. The vast oil wealth located in the troubled area of the Sunni Triangle is the controversy and the hotbed issue that will bring civil war to Iraq.

Bush arrogance got us into a situation that has no end to it! Democracy will not come to Iraq because its' people do not want democracy.

In the middle of all this is our young military men and they are dying daily. Bush says, "He will stay the course". The course is failing and when do you say when?
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
O'Neill and Clarke have given us an inside picture of the Bush aministration for three years.

 

I got this far and couldn't stop laughing! One peabrain who claims to have 19,000 documents to backup his lame stories and yet he fails to release any. The other is now a proven liar.

So please don't say "us", because I'm not that naive to believe this load of garbage.
 
 
I saw on the news today that the marines were coming in and they were going to be playing a little Isreali urban renewal. Leveling blocks and making an example. Look the population of Fallujah prepatrated these crimes. It was a people so the populus is responsible. March in and make the population realize it's mistake. Level buildnings kill gunmen, aresst politicains, have a pressence from now till eternity. Marshall Law basically, any on the streets after dark will be shot no questions asked.
 
 
 
It is evident that Bush and his administration were focus on Iraq coming into office.

 

"What is your definition of 'it'?" (Does that sound familiar?!) 'Nuff said.
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
It is evident that Bush and his administration were focus on Iraq coming into office. The citizens need to asked themselves did Bush undermind war on terrorism by invading Iraq?

 

Of course the Bush administration had some focus on Iraq. Saddam has been causing problems since the Gulf War. Its been the policy of The United States to pursue regime change since the Clinton administration. Of course any President who has been paying attention to the news at all during the last 12 years is going to know we have to have a plan to deal with Iraq. 911 just increased the urgency to topple Saddam because he supported terrorrism.
 
 
We are on the verge of losing Iraq to civil war. All these wonderful philosopies are great, not so great when someone has an AK-47 in your face. Look I am all for peace; however, we must regain control. I strongly suggest that we perform a "semi-surgical strike" on the block these murderers hide (Fallujah and other hot spots), load up some B-52's with 2,000 pound dumb bombs and obliterate the whole area. I am not for "carpet bombing" but we must instill a bit of terror in these people. Yes, innocents will die; better them than us. Collateral damage is what makes war terrible; it should be... messy, brutal, ruthless, horrific. We are making it so clean and so precision oriented that when just one of our weapons kills an innocent we are hammered for it! Follow the rules of the Geneva Convention, but it is imperative that at this critical point we press back brutally to gain serious control of this or we will be making a deadly error.
If we send in teams on the ground they will die. These killers are just waiting for us; we must rain down hell from above.
Please do not take what I'm writing as a hateful message; it is one based on passion, and what I think the best tactic is for us. If we keep giving little pin pricks more people will die on both sides.
As a Christian it pains my heart and soul to suggest such horrible ideas, but sitting on the fence will only get us shot of of it. This war will never end as it is a war not of ideas, economic, geography or politics; it is of faith, religion (on their part), an impossible "war" to win. The best we can do is hurt them so badly they do not dare attack us.
I know the WMD's will be brought up. I believe they were either destoyed prior to the war, buried or moved. Saddam had months to make this happen, this was a great move to make President Bush look bad. It worked, so far.
In summary, we did great during the war, but now politics is getting our courageous men and women murdered. Let our brave military do their job!
 
 
Great post, welcome triggerfish!  
 
 
 
Iraq is so close to a civil war.

 

i totally agree.

 
Bush arrogance got us into a situation that has no end to it!

 

i also agree. there is NO END IN SIGHT. not sure if arrogance is the right word. the guy has problem just finishing one speech without sounding like a complete embarassment to our language, let alone our representation of our country. cheney is definitely the brains in this outfit. i doubt bush has a very good reason to be 'arrogant'. could be.

i CAN'T WAIT to see the 'transfer of power'. as much as i want this iraqi operation liberation thing to be a 'success', the situation gets farther from being just that every single day.

 
These killers are just waiting for us; we must rain down hell from above.

 

 
As a Christian it pains my heart and soul to suggest such horrible ideas,

 

contradiction, anyone? i've no use for false sympathy, when one sits behind a monitor and CONDONES death for the 'righteous cause'. someone may be in for a suprise sitting at the pearly gates   last i heard 'He" wasn't too fond of ANY humans dealing out final judgement. god bless america, right?   what a warped sense of idealism!
 
 
It is this idea that is going to get us through this time in our history. Why do we have to be the shinning example of morality while our enimies fight us knowing we will be a moral combatant. War by defintion is not a moral act. it is time we do the right thing and show the world the true horror of a war against the US. That is how we won WW2. We showed japan and germany the absoulute horor of war. This show was not alloted only to insurgents, combatants, or govt leaders. The whole population suffered and the whole population was defeated. We defeated the Iraqi regiem. Now we have to deffeat the Iraqi people.
 
 
 
I strongly suggest that we perform a "semi-surgical strike" on the block these murderers hide (Fallujah and other hot spots), load up some B-52's with 2,000 pound dumb bombs and obliterate the whole area. I am not for "carpet bombing" but we must instill a bit of terror in these people. Yes, innocents will die; better them than us. Collateral damage is what makes war terrible; it should be... messy, brutal, ruthless, horrific.

 

Yay "Vigilant Resolve!" See below for details!

 http://news.yahoo.com/news?tmpl=stor..._re_mi_ea/iraq 
 
 
Spillmind, may I ask you if any person in the military who plans or carries out orders that kill people a hypocrite or not going to heaven? Do you think that those who do such things may feel anguish, pain or suffer? I; for one do, and would not condemn them in any way. I do not, nor do I believe that anyone who has served in the military thinks that war or killing is trivial or meaningless. Most people I know do not ever want war again. This war must be fought for the good of all. Any action we take; even though tragic events will occur, is for the protection of everyone.
What do you suggest we do? These people hate us and want us dead no matter where we are, what we do or don't do. It's either fight or die. Oh, there's that issue at the pearly gates! Dag nab it anyway! Maybe the martyrs have something going, what do you think? All that wine and women..........
 
 
 
Now we have to deffeat the Iraqi people.

 

So is that somehow a new part of bush's war on "terror"?
 
 
 
Spillmind, may I ask you if any person in the military who plans or carries out orders that kill people a hypocrite or not going to heaven?

 

i am certainly not going to assume what judgement your God has for these people. but being a tool for administering DEATH cannot weigh very lightly on the scales of judgement.

 
I do not, nor do I believe that anyone who has served in the military thinks that war or killing is trivial or meaningless.

 

it doesn't matter what your 'meaning' is, there is a commandment that states SPECIFICALLY: THOU SHALL NOT KILL.
now i'm sure you've got some interpretation that supports your rendition of it that makes it ok in your mind. it's pretty clear to me. i'm sure cluster bombing will be forgiven by Him, right? you need to get real and ASK JESUS what he thinks before you start conding this kind of action against HUMANKIND.

 
Any action we take; even though tragic events will occur, is for the protection of everyone.

 

i'm sure He will love to hear it put like that. who said anyone is being protected? and did He give the go ahead on that one, too? your case gets weaker as it goes on.

 
What do you suggest we do? These people hate us and want us dead no matter where we are, what we do or don't do. It's either fight or die.

 

where do you get this from? FOX news?   iraq was NOT about to invade the US, iraq was not actively being anymore murderous or was saddam being anymore of tyrant than dozens of other countries in the world. all fine and dandy, if you don't mind being INCONSISTENT. too bad you can't pick your battles whe you go with the 'moral' agrument, eh???

these people HATE US? why do you think that is??? maybe if you ever stopper to ask yourself that question, you might find a little insight. the answers are inside you, you just have to want to listen.
 
 
 
Originally posted by Palestinian Jew
So is that somehow a new part of bush's war on "terror"?

 

Why do you work so hard to lay everything on Bush's shoulders when you know damn well the Dems voted for war, made the same claims about WMD and spoke of removing Saddam in the same manner? Do you need the MANY quotes provided to you again?

The is the UNITED STATES OF AMERICA'S war on terror, not just GWB.
 
 
Bush had every intension of invading Iraq even before being elected president. This was confirmed by the Actor,Sean Astin who is a republican and worked closely with Bush during his 2000 campaign. Astin, on the HBO Bill Maher, said anyone close to Bush knew what that a war with Iraq was priority with the Bush administration.

Worldnews, reported that 9 days after 9/11, Bush met with Tony Blair and asked for his help in removing Saddam.

O'Neill in his book wrote, "How obsess Bush and his administration was with Iraq." And Clarke testified and wrote in his book that the Bush administration held 100 meeting a day to discuss Iraq and not one meeting was held on Al Qaeda or terrorism. Hours after 9/11, Bush ordered Clarke to find out that Iraq did it.

There is plenty of public information about the priorities of the Bush administration and war on terrorism was not one of them. Bush held one meeting in August 2001 on terrorism and nothing was done.

What is so funny is FBI/CIA knew an attack was imminent and prepared for it by protecting Americans overseas and military bases around America but the American people was never told and left vulnerable.
 
 
Bush wanted to confront Saddam before 9/11.

So?

Of course. The guy was shooting at our planes. He was violating international law. He was violating cease fires. He was violating war treaties. He was funding terrorism. He was sheltering people who commited the 1993 WTC attack, (Abdul Yassin). He was making WMD, (or so the entire world thought). He was voicing his opinion on how he would "destroy America" and he was killing his own people.

Of course Bush wanted to confront Saddam pre-9/11.

Would he have gotten away with a preemptive war against Iraq pre-9/11? No. Then again, had Bush tried to do a preemptive war against Afghanistan pre-9/11, every Democrat would be complaining.
 
 
Iraq has nothing to do with war on terrorism! Afghanistan is war on terrorism and Bush put military soldiers in Afghanistan, in harms way when he removed many of the military weapons from Afghanistan to be shipped to fight in Iraq! The Taliban came back stronger in Afghanistan! Today the fight against Al Qaeda in Afghanistan is a furious battle.
 
 
>>>Iraq has nothing to do with war on terrorism! Afghanistan is war on terrorism and Bush put military soldiers in Afghanistan, in harms way when he removed many of the military weapons from Afghanistan to be shipped to fight in Iraq! The Taliban came back stronger in Afghanistan! Today the fight against Al Qaeda in Afghanistan is a furious battle.<<<

After 9/11, Tommy Franks wanted to blanket Afghanistan with soldiers. Rumsfeld said no, fighting terror networks is like fighting a non-geographical force. Thus, we put in a light, quick, fast fighting force in Afghanistan.

The Northern Alliance did most of the ground work. We did the air work. With just a few thousand soldiers, we did in a few weeks, what the Soviet Union couldn't do in 10 years.

There's no "furious battle" in Afghanistan. What furious battle? Do you hear about anything in Afghanistan much anymore? How many Americans have died in Afghanistan?

Fighting Osama bin Laden can be done with 1,000 forces the same as it can be done with 500,000 forces. You cannot INVADE A MAN.

Iraq is a HUGE part of the War on Terror and I guess we forever will agree to disagree there.

We hear Saddam didn't support terrorism...

- He funded Hamas.
- He funded Islamic Jihad.
- He funded Abu-Sayyaf, a group with ties to al-Qaeda.
- He funded Hezbollah (the world's 2nd largest terrorist group).
- He funded Ansar al-Islam, (a group with direct ties to al-Qaeda).
- He sponsored the MEK, the ANO, the PLF, and the PKK.
- He sheltered Abu Nidal, a man who killed over 900 people in 90 attacks in 25 countries.
- He sponsored the ANO.
- He sponsored the PLO.
- He sheltered Abdul Yassin, one of the terrorists in the 1993 WTC attack.
- He sheltered one of the world's most wanted terrorists, and leader of the PLF, Abu Abbas.
- He sheltered al-Qaeda/Ansar operative Abu Musab al-Zarqawi.
- According to Germany, Iraqi officials met al-Qaeda operatives in 1998.
- The man killed 750,000 of his own people at the least and 2 million at the most.
- Ayman al-Zawahiri met with Iraqi officials in 1991.

To me, that's part of the War on Terror. If Iraq isn't part of the War on Terror, what is? If we attacked Iran instead of Iraq, would that be part of the War on Terror?
 
 
 
Why do you work so hard to lay everything on Bush's shoulders when you know damn well the Dems voted for war, made the same claims about WMD and spoke of removing Saddam in the same manner? Do you need the MANY quotes provided to you again?

 

Bush is the one that made the case for the war. If he hadn't brought it up, we wouldn't be there. I've heard what the dems have said many times and it sums up to pure partisanship.

Its also my opinion that Bush mislead the country with handpicked intelligence and I also believe that the CIA knew there weren't any WMD in Iraq especially when they know there were WMD in Libya.
 
 
Democracts were afraid of the American people, who were demanding bloodshed revenge for 9/11. We were so blinded by rage and hate. Bush rallied and fed into that hate. Our taste for blood made it easy for Bush to take advantage of U.S. citizens and target Saddam, whom was on Bush's agenda! The Democracts knew they were defenseless against billions of hateful grieving U.S. citizens, who are voters.

610 dead U.S. soldiers later and America is finally waking up! War on Iraq has sealed America's fate that terrorism is here to stay and America for ever will be hit by terrorism. You can thank Bush for that.
 
 
>>>Its also my opinion that Bush mislead the country with handpicked intelligence and I also believe that the CIA knew there weren't any WMD in Iraq especially when they know there were WMD in Libya.<<<

Handpicked intelligence from the same intelligence Congress sees first? lol

Oh... so Tenet knew there weren't WMD in Iraq? Question: What happened to the ones Saddam admitted to having? Why didn't he account for them? Why didn't he open up his country so he can retain the billions he was losing? Why did he detain UN inspectors and blindfold them? Why wouldn't he let us interview Iraqi scientists?

Why did he violate 17 resolutions concerning his WMD 333 times? Did you see that? 333. Not once, which would have justified force... but 333.

Were France and Germany lying when their intelligence agencies said Saddam had WMD and would have nukes by 2005?
 
 
And I do thank Bush for sealing our fate, because our fate is a good one: triump over radicalism.

Bush is to the War on Terror what Truman was to the Cold War. When will people get on board?

If Bush was "thriving off of our bloodlust," why did he wait a month to attack the Taliban? Why? You know why? He was working with Pakistan, in one of the best, yet most over-looked diplomatic negotiations ever.

Pakistan could have been hit for 9/11, yet we avoided a war with them and instead they're on our side.
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Democracts were afraid of the American people, who were demanding bloodshed revenge for 9/11. We were so blinded by rage and hate. Bush rallied and fed into that hate. Our taste for blood made it easy for Bush to take advantage of U.S. citizens and target Saddam, whom was on Bush's agenda! The Democracts knew they were defenseless against billions of hateful grieving U.S. citizens, who are voters.

610 dead U.S. soldiers later and America is finally waking up! War on Iraq has sealed America's fate that terrorism is here to stay and America for ever will be hit by terrorism. You can thank Bush for that.

 

We were in this war long before Bush was in office and we'll be in this war long after Bush leaves office(in 2008   ). This problam is not a republican or democrate problem. This is a Clash of civilizations, West vs. Radical Islam. There is no middle ground, no truce that could stop the killing. There is no peace without victory, and there is no victory without fighting. War is hell gentelmen, our enemy welcomes dealth. His life is horribal anyway dealth frees him from his missery. I on the other hand love life, I love it so much i have no problem helping that son of a bitch along in his quest to kill himself. You'ld better be willing to do the same!!!  
 
 
 
Handpicked intelligence from the same intelligence Congress sees first? lol

 

Last time I checked, the public doesn't get the same intelligence, and its the public that makes the congress do what it wants.

 
so Tenet knew there weren't WMD in Iraq?

 

Thats correct. Unless you are willing to say that Tenet was not telling the truth about the CIA knowing there were WMD in Libya and that Libya was giving up its rogue state ways.

 
What happened to the ones Saddam admitted to having? Why didn't he account for them? Why didn't he open up his country so he can retain the billions he was losing? Why did he detain UN inspectors and blindfold them? Why wouldn't he let us interview Iraqi scientists?

 

You act like Saddam had control over his country. Iraq was and still is a mess. Saddam had a huge ego and didn't want the world pushing him around. simple as that.

 
Why did he violate 17 resolutions concerning his WMD 333 times? Did you see that? 333. Not once, which would have justified force... but 333.

 

And did you see how the UN voted that action didn't need to be taken against Iraq? I think the UN is a waste of time and I don't care at all what they say.

 
Where France and Germany lying when their intelligence agencies said Saddam had WMD and would have nukes by 2005?

 

So now we have to go off of what France and Germany's intelligence says when we have the best intelligence agency in the world? Yeah, he could probably have nukes in 2005 by buying one from a threat we totally ignored b/c of Iraq, North Korea.
 
 
You're from San Fran and like Bush?

Holy God.
 
 
It is no secret that Saddam hates Israel. He support any one fighting Israel and Saddam himself have sent bombs to destroy Israel but Saddam was no threat to the United States nor did Saddam support any terrorist groups that were no afraid to strike America.

All the evidence have been proven that Saddam had no WMD-no link to Al Qeada, and no link to 9/11!
 
 
 
Originally posted by preemptingyou03
You're from San Fran and like Bush?

Holy God.

 

I assume you mean me, and no. I'm from Minneapolis and i am going to school at the university of Montana in Missoula. The San Fran part is because this town is so liberal that it belongs in the city of San Francisco.
 
 
You, sir, are flat out an idiot.

Now, I don't wish to get into name calling. You can call me a guinea and it'll be even. I gave you a chance to explain yourself, and I have come to the conclusion that you are either not bright, or you are overwhelmingly and figuratively blind.

>>>Last time I checked, the public doesn't get the same intelligence, and its the public that makes the congress do what it wants.<<<

Last time I checked, Congress saw the same intel. as Bush. Last time I checked, Clinton laid out a far better case about Saddam's WMD than Bush.

>>>You act like Saddam had control over his country.<<<

Umm... yea, that's what dictators have... control over their country. Total, complete, absolute control.

I'm not saying we should rely on French or German intelligence. But if you will accuse someone of misleading, understand, EVERYONE THOUGHT THIS. You claim the UN is a waste... well... should we ignore the UN? The UN stated Saddam was in violation 333 times. Yet, BUSH was the only liar.

If you can't answer these questions, this debate's over.
 
 
Anybody that sponsors ANY FORM OF TERRORISM is a threat to the United States. If al-Qaeda can attack us, Hamas can. If al-Qaeda can attack us, Hezbollah can.

And Saddam did have al-Qaeda links. Must I go into depth?
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
It is no secret that Saddam hates Israel. He support any one fighting Israel and Saddam himself have sent bombs to destroy Israel but Saddam was no threat to the United States nor did Saddam support any terrorist groups that were no afraid to strike America.

All the evidence have been proven that Saddam had no WMD-no link to Al Qeada, and no link to 9/11!

 

Is Isreal not an allie? If it is is it not a responsability we should take upon our selfs to help rid Isreal an enemy. And support of Terror is support of terror. There is no middle ground. Saddam supported terror, end of story. Bush doctrine states that he is open to attack. He was attacked don't like the new foriegn policy well get used to it because Bush will be around for 4 more years and I'm pretty sure in '08 someone from his cabniet will be in office. You dems had your chance to run this country. You failed and invited 9-11. Now let the party that means buissness handle your mess.  
 
 
Until Democrats conclude they will follow the doctrine of preemption, they have no business being in power in a post-9/11 world. There's a reason Republicans control the White House, Pentagon, courts, Congress, states, churches...
 
 
Bush has help Al Qaeda with its' recriutment. It is all over the media that Al Qaeda was just a small fragment but since the war on Iraq, Al Qaeda has evolved into a worldwide organization and western intel don't know who or where they are!

Experts are saying if we capture or kill Osama, Al Qaeda is stronger with or without Osama.
 
 
So? Was recruitment better with hundreds of terrorist camps, al-Qaeda operatives on the loose, and millions of funds coming to them? What about after attacking us in 1993, 1995, 1996, 1998, and 2000 and us doing nothing?

The only way to get rid of the recruits is to establish free governments in the Middle East. That will win hearts and minds. If that isn't our strategy, the only option is to not fight, because it'll "recruit terrorists."
 
 
Thanks for calling me an idiot while I actually use facts to back my opinions and you might want to use proper english when calling someone an idiot.

 
Last time I checked, Congress saw the same intel. as Bush. Last time I checked, Clinton laid out a far better case about Saddam's WMD than Bush.

 

I'm not a Clinton cocksucker like most dems. Its possible that he tried to distract the country with Iraq WMD during Lewinski, but its also possible that Clinton destroyed Saddam's WMD programs.

 
Umm... yea, that's what dictators have... control over their country. Total, complete, absolute control.

 

Lets see if you can connect the dots. During the Gulf War, Iraqis were surrendering by the thousands. When Bush I said that he'd support an Iraqi revolt, they revolted and were put down. During this current war, the only real resistance U.S. forces met was at baghdad with Saddam's own army. Saddam's scientists weren't developing WMD, even though he oredered them to. The Kurds were pretty independent, the Shi'a weren't linked with Saddam. My conclusion is that the people weren't loyal to Saddam and he really didn't have absolute control.

 
I'm not saying we should rely on French or German intelligence. But if you will accuse someone of misleading, understand, EVERYONE THOUGHT THIS. You claim the UN is a waste... well... should we ignore the UN? The UN stated Saddam was in violation 333 times.

 

I would say we should ignore the UN, but unfortunately most people wouldn't agree with me. So, even though Saddam violated the UN law, the UN voted that he shouldn't be punished.

 
Yet, BUSH was the only liar.

 

I didn't say that, there's also Cheney, Rummy, Condi, and a coerced Powell.  
 
 
Bush preemptive strike was not a success. Bush liberated people who hate America. It is very clear that Iraq is a hostile country and no longer a liberated country!

Bush preemptive strike was against the wrong country! Iraq is not guilty! No WMD! No link to Al Qeada! No link to 9/11! Bush waged war against the wrong country! Face IT!

We don't need to use preemptive policy! We need to protect our borders and the people within them! That is something Bush has failed miserable at!
 
 
Why is Powell coerced? Cause he's not so blunt like Rumsfeld? The politics is so disgusting.
 
 
Powell admitted to NATO that the information he presented before the UN was not trueful.
 
 
>>>Bush preemptive strike was against the wrong country! Iraq is not guilty! No WMD! No link to Al Qeada! No link to 9/11! Bush waged war against the wrong country! Face IT!<<<

We did wage war against Afghanistan, though. No WMD? Who thought otherwise? Name a nation in Europe that didn't think Saddam had WMD.

No al-Qaeda link? Abu Musab al-Zarqawi? Ansar al-Islam? Hezbollah? Must I get into the al-Qaeda link in depth? Because I will if you want.

No link to 9/11? Again... so?

>>>We don't need to use preemptive policy! We need to protect our borders and the people within them! That is something Bush has failed miserable at!<<<

Yeah, Bush failed at protecting use. Ever hear of Jose Padilla and Iyman Faris? Ever hear of the Patriot Act? 77% of Americans trust Bush to prevent a terrorist attack over Kerry, a man who wanted cut funds in intelligence before and after terrorist attacks in the 1990s, (which his Democartic leader Clinton didn't respond to).
 
 
No, he said it may have been false. He didn't say "we lied." He said "we might have been wrong." "We" as in "the planet."
 
 
Bush has lost the hearts and minds of the Iraqis! Bush was so glad to be the "war president" without a plan for recontruction of Iraq. Iraq has been nothing but choas and more and more innocent women and children being killed! All because Bush wanted to go down in history at the 'war president'! Now, he will go down in history as the most pathetic president that did not have common sense to plan a war and recontruction!
 
 
77% of Iraqis have a positive view about America and 8 out of 10 say their lives will be better next year.

In fact, Bush has a better approval rating in Iraq than he does in America. That's saying something about Dems.

In five years, look at Iraq. Are you hoping for a failure there?
 
 
Just curious... when Iraq is a free society, do you think that will inflame or reduce radicalism for future generations of Muslims in the Middle East?
 
 
 
Abu Musab al-Zarqawi? Ansar al-Islam? Hezbollah? Must I get into the al-Qaeda link in depth? Because I will if you want.

 

Actually, I think I'd like to see this link, especially when people that are experts on Iraq and terrorism say there is no link. Is al-Zarqawi by chance the guy that Powell talked about in his presentation. And on your in depth link, I'd also like to know what parts of the country they were in.
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Bush preemptive strike was not a success. Bush liberated people who hate America. It is very clear that Iraq is a hostile country and no longer a liberated country!

Bush preemptive strike was against the wrong country! Iraq is not guilty! No WMD! No link to Al Qeada! No link to 9/11! Bush waged war against the wrong country! Face IT!

We don't need to use preemptive policy! We need to protect our borders and the people within them! That is something Bush has failed miserable at!

 

That is a policy of preemption. in oreder to police a free society to the abbility where we will stop all terrorists is mind boggeling, we would seice to be a free society and you would be tracked everywere you went. The fight is in the middle east, that is where we need to go, protecting our borders wont do anything, time is an enemy of the weak, because your enemy only gets stronger. Preemption is the best policy to fight terror, we need to attack these people where they live, because guess what they need state sponsership or at least safe haven. If we attack everycountry that supports terror, the ones we don't attack will give up and condone to the US will(ie Lybia). It works, don't be a pussy the oceans don't protect us anymore. War is a fact of Life on planet earth. We are no where near a Utopia and we will never be near a utopia. Vilence is the only way to slove problems, i'm sorry but our moms' were wrong.
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Powell admitted to NATO that the information he presented before the UN was not trueful.

 

evidence, link, qoute?
 
 
 
when Iraq is a free society

 

Please pull your head out of GWB's ass. Iraq will never be a free society because the Iraqis aren't fighting for it.
 
 
Bottomline: Saddam did not have WMD since 1995 and Clinton had the factories bombed. Bush lied about the WMD! Bush knew he lied that is the reason for so many renaming of the invasion: 1. disarm Saddam; 2. Iraq had terrorists; 3. liberate the Iraqi people. Bush wanted to be a hero and, now, he looks like a fool!
 
 
Powell said the WMD issue he presented may have been flawed. Obviously. We haven't found any WMD. But, the al-Qaeda link is fully there, while still murky. The terrorism link is overwhelming.

We know the words "Osama bin Laden" were whited out by Iraqi officials on documents. After the Gulf War, Saddam decided it was in his best interest to ally himself with radical networks, to work against Israel and America, covertly, without his fingerprints. Saddam didn't do 9/11, no. But he was a terrorist.

* Abdul Rahman Yasin was the only member of the al Qaeda cell that detonated the 1993 World Trade Center bomb to remain at large in the Clinton years. He fled to Iraq. U.S. forces recently discovered a cache of documents in Tikrit, Saddam's hometown, that show that Iraq gave Mr. Yasin both a house and monthly salary.

* Bin Laden met at least eight times with officers of Iraq's Special Security Organization, a secret police agency run by Saddam's son Qusay, and met with officials from Saddam's mukhabarat, its external intelligence service, according to intelligence made public by Secretary of State Colin Powell, who was speaking before the United Nations Security Council on February 6, 2003.

* Sudanese intelligence officials told me that their agents had observed meetings between Iraqi intelligence agents and bin Laden starting in 1994, when bin Laden lived in Khartoum.

* Bin Laden met the director of the Iraqi mukhabarat in 1996 in Khartoum, according to Mr. Powell.

* An al Qaeda operative now held by the U.S. confessed that in the mid-1990s, bin Laden had forged an agreement with Saddam's men to cease all terrorist activities against the Iraqi dictator, Mr. Powell told the United Nations.

* In 1999 the Guardian, a British newspaper, reported that Farouk Hijazi, a senior officer in Iraq's mukhabarat, had journeyed deep into the icy mountains near Kandahar, Afghanistan, in December 1998 to meet with al Qaeda men. Mr. Hijazi is "thought to have offered bin Laden asylum in Iraq," the Guardian reported.

* In October 2000, another Iraqi intelligence operative, Salah Suleiman, was arrested near the Afghan border by Pakistani authorities, according to Jane's Foreign Report, a respected international newsletter. Jane's reported that Suleiman was shuttling between Iraqi intelligence and Ayman al Zawahiri, now al Qaeda's No. 2 man.

(Why are all of those meetings significant? The London Observer reports that FBI investigators cite a captured al Qaeda field manual in Afghanistan, which "emphasizes the value of conducting discussions about pending terrorist attacks face to face, rather than by electronic means.")

* As recently as 2001, Iraq's embassy in Pakistan was used as a "liaison" between the Iraqi dictator and al Qaeda, Mr. Powell told the United Nations.

* Spanish investigators have uncovered documents seized from Yusuf Galan -- who is charged by a Spanish court with being "directly involved with the preparation and planning" of the Sept. 11 attacks -- that show the terrorist was invited to a party at the Iraqi embassy in Madrid. The invitation used his "al Qaeda nom de guerre," London's Independent reports.

* An Iraqi defector to Turkey, known by his cover name as "Abu Mohammed," told Gwynne Roberts of the Sunday Times of London that he saw bin Laden's fighters in camps in Iraq in 1997. At the time, Mohammed was a colonel in Saddam's Fedayeen. He described an encounter at Salman Pak, the training facility southeast of Baghdad. At that vast compound run by Iraqi intelligence, Muslim militants trained to hijack planes with knives -- on a full-size Boeing 707. Col. Mohammed recalls his first visit to Salman Pak this way: "We were met by Colonel Jamil Kamil, the camp manager, and Major Ali Hawas. I noticed that a lot of people were queuing for food. (The major) said to me: 'You'll have nothing to do with these people. They are Osama bin Laden's group and the PKK and Mojahedin-e Khalq.'"

* In 1998, Abbas al-Janabi, a longtime aide to Saddam's son Uday, defected to the West. At the time, he repeatedly told reporters that there was a direct connection between Iraq and al Qaeda.

*The Sunday Times found a Saddam loyalist in a Kurdish prison who claims to have been Dr. Zawahiri's bodyguard during his 1992 visit with Saddam in Baghdad. Dr. Zawahiri was a close associate of bin Laden at the time and was present at the founding of al Qaeda in 1989.

* Following the defeat of the Taliban, almost two dozen bin Laden associates "converged on Baghdad and established a base of operations there," Mr. Powell told the United Nations in February 2003. From their Baghdad base, the secretary said, they supervised the movement of men, materiel and money for al Qaeda's global network.

* In 2001, an al Qaeda member "bragged that the situation in Iraq was 'good,'" according to intelligence made public by Mr. Powell.

* That same year, Saudi Arabian border guards arrested two al Qaeda members entering the kingdom from Iraq.

* Abu Musaab al-Zarqawi oversaw an al Qaeda training camp in Afghanistan, Mr. Powell told the United Nations. His specialty was poisons. Wounded in fighting with U.S. forces, he sought medical treatment in Baghdad in May 2002. When Zarqawi recovered, he restarted a training camp in northern Iraq. Zarqawi's Iraq cell was later tied to the October 2002 murder of Lawrence Foley, an official of the U.S. Agency for International Development, in Amman, Jordan. The captured assassin confessed that he received orders and funds from Zarqawi's cell in Iraq, Mr. Powell said. His accomplice escaped to Iraq.

*Zarqawi met with military chief of al Qaeda, Mohammed Ibrahim Makwai (aka Saif al-Adel) in Iran in February 2003, according to intelligence sources cited by the Washington Post.

* Mohammad Atef, the head of al Qaeda's military wing until the U.S. killed him in Afghanistan in November 2001, told a senior al Qaeda member now in U.S. custody that the terror network needed labs outside of Afghanistan to manufacture chemical weapons, Mr. Powell said. "Where did they go, where did they look?" said the secretary. "They went to Iraq."

* Abu Abdullah al-Iraqi was sent to Iraq by bin Laden to purchase poison gases several times between 1997 and 2000. He called his relationship with Saddam's regime "successful," Mr. Powell told the United Nations.

* Mohamed Mansour Shahab, a smuggler hired by Iraq to transport weapons to bin Laden in Afghanistan, was arrested by anti-Hussein Kurdish forces in May, 2000. He later told his story to American intelligence and a reporter for the New Yorker magazine.

* Documents found among the debris of the Iraqi Intelligence Center show that Baghdad funded the Allied Democratic Forces, a Ugandan terror group led by an Islamist cleric linked to bin Laden. According to a London's Daily Telegraph, the organization offered to recruit "youth to train for the jihad" at a "headquarters for international holy warrior network" to be established in Baghdad.

* Mullah Melan Krekar, ran a terror group (the Ansar al-Islam) linked to both bin Laden and Saddam Hussein. Mr. Krekar admitted to a Kurdish newspaper that he met bin Laden in Afghanistan and other senior al Qaeda officials. His acknowledged meetings with bin Laden go back to 1988. When he organized Ansar al Islam in 2001 to conduct suicide attacks on Americans, "three bin Laden operatives showed up with a gift of $300,000 'to undertake jihad,'" Newsday reported. Mr. Krekar is now in custody in the Netherlands. His group operated in portion of northern Iraq loyal to Saddam Hussein -- and attacked independent Kurdish groups hostile to Saddam. A spokesman for the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan told a United Press International correspondent that Mr. Krekar's group was funded by "Saddam Hussein's regime in Baghdad."

* After October 2001, hundreds of al Qaeda fighters are believed to have holed up in the Ansar al-Islam's strongholds inside northern Iraq.

Some skeptics dismiss the emerging evidence of a longstanding link between Iraq and al Qaeda by contending that Saddam ran a secular dictatorship hated by Islamists like bin Laden.

In fact, there are plenty of "Stalin-Roosevelt" partnerships between international terrorists and Muslim dictators. Saddam and bin Laden had common enemies, common purposes and interlocking needs. They shared a powerful hate for America and the Saudi royal family. They both saw the Gulf War as a turning point. Saddam suffered a crushing defeat which he had repeatedly vowed to avenge. Bin Laden regards the U.S. as guilty of war crimes against Iraqis and believes that non-Muslims shouldn't have military bases on the holy sands of Arabia. Al Qaeda's avowed goal for the past ten years has been the removal of American forces from Saudi Arabia, where they stood in harm's way solely to contain Saddam.

The most compelling reason for bin Laden to work with Saddam is money. Al Qaeda operatives have testified in federal courts that the terror network was always desperate for cash. Senior employees fought bitterly about the $100 difference in pay between Egyptian and Saudis (the Egyptians made more). One al Qaeda member, who was connected to the 1998 embassy bombings, told a U.S. federal court how bitter he was that bin Laden could not pay for his pregnant wife to see a doctor.

Bin Laden's personal wealth alone simply is not enough to support a profligate global organization. Besides, bin Laden's fortune is probably not as large as some imagine. Informed estimates put bin Laden's pre-Sept. 11, 2001 wealth at perhaps $30 million. $30 million is the budget of a small school district, not a global terror conglomerate. Meanwhile, Forbes estimated Saddam's personal fortune at $2 billion.

So a common enemy, a shared goal and powerful need for cash seem to have forged an alliance between Saddam and bin Laden. CIA Director George Tenet recently told the Senate Intelligence Committee: "Iraq has in the past provided training in document forgery and bomb making to al Qaeda. It also provided training in poisons and gasses to two al Qaeda associates; one of these [al Qaeda] associates characterized the relationship as successful. Mr. Chairman, this information is based on a solid foundation of intelligence. It comes to us from credible and reliable sources. Much of it is corroborated by multiple sources."

The Iraqis, who had the Third World's largest poison-gas operations prior to the Gulf War I, have perfected the technique of making hydrogen-cyanide gas, which the Nazis called Zyklon-B. In the hands of al Qaeda, this would be a fearsome weapon in an enclosed space -- like a suburban mall or subway station.
 
 
CNN posted an article on 04/03/04: Powell admitted that the evidence presented before the UN was not trueful!
 
 
>>>Please pull your head out of GWB's ass. Iraq will never be a free society because the Iraqis aren't fighting for it.<<<

What about the 200,000 Iraqi police officers?
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Bush has lost the hearts and minds of the Iraqis! Bush was so glad to be the "war president" without a plan for recontruction of Iraq. Iraq has been nothing but choas and more and more innocent women and children being killed! All because Bush wanted to go down in history at the 'war president'! Now, he will go down in history as the most pathetic president that did not have common sense to plan a war and recontruction!

 

and Clinton will go down as a Lieing, cheating, worthless, lucky president. Bush will go down as the pesident who started to win the war on terror, Clinton will go down as the president who did nothing about the war on terror. Get over it, Bush is a "war president" something we haven't ahd since Regan, and something we need now! wait 50 years and read a history book. Bush will be rembered along with presidents such as, Regan, Truman, Teddy Rosevelt, and all the other presidents who led this country to fight an enemy you pussies don't think exists!!!
 
 
>>>Bottomline: Saddam did not have WMD since 1995 and Clinton had the factories bombed. Bush lied about the WMD! Bush knew he lied that is the reason for so many renaming of the invasion: 1. disarm Saddam; 2. Iraq had terrorists; 3. liberate the Iraqi people. Bush wanted to be a hero and, now, he looks like a fool!<<<

You're officially on ignore. Bush lied? Then the world lied. You can't understand this because you are blind. Bush is the only liar. Not France. Not Kerry. Not Congress. Not the UN. Not Tariq Aziz. Not Germany. Not Saddam's violations. Nope. Just Bush.

Like Bush was saying in 2003, "Let's invade Iraq because he doesn't have WMD, so then during the re-election campaign everyone will know!"
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Bottomline: Saddam did not have WMD since 1995 and Clinton had the factories bombed. Bush lied about the WMD! Bush knew he lied that is the reason for so many renaming of the invasion: 1. disarm Saddam; 2. Iraq had terrorists; 3. liberate the Iraqi people. Bush wanted to be a hero and, now, he looks like a fool!

 

again links, quotes, proof? Don't say Bush lied if you can't prove it!!
 
 
Powell, is no longer creditable on the subject of Iraq!
 
 
There's no proof Bush lied. None. And if you point to anything, it is something the entire world agreed with Bush upon. It's such a f*ckin' joke.

Ya know what... I bet we find WMD in Iraq. There I said it. The world thought something. So I say the world was right. Baghdad's the size of LA? Iraq's the size of California? I say we find it in a basement somewhere. After all...

"Mr. Hussein hides proof of his weaponry underneath the lawns of Mosul, Baghdad, and Tikrit citizens."
- Adnad Saed, Iraqi defector, 2001
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
CNN posted an article on 04/03/04: Powell admitted that the evidence presented before the UN was not trueful!

 

Link!!!!
 
 
No, there is a link. But he's taking out of context. Powell said some of it may have been wrong. Powell isn't saying he lied.
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Powell, is no longer creditable on the subject of Iraq!

 

Why because you think he said something, if anybody in the Bush admin is the most credibale it is Powell!
 
 
 
Originally posted by preemptingyou03
No, there is a link. But he's taking out of context. Powell said some of it may have been wrong. Powell isn't saying he lied.

 

OK, that all, I knew he'ld never say
"We LIED about the weapons in Iraq."
 
 
Democrats hate Bush more than they hated Reagan. That's saying something. It's a shame we have to play politics. It really is. But they are playing it. And it is a political season.
 
 
Bush lied. That's it. Bush decided regime change, that's it.

Not the Congress, who voted for this on October 5, 1998 by a vote of 360 - 38. Not the Senate, who voted for this UNANIMOUSLY on October 7, 1998. And certainly not President Clinton who signed the bill into law number No: 105-338 on October 31, 1998.

Not Kerry.

Not the UN (333 times).

Not Italy.

Not Clinton.

Not Mrs. Clinton.

Not Kennedy.

Not France or Germany or Russia or China or India.

Just Bush.
 
 
Iraq did not have terrorist until America invaded Iraq! The attacks on our soldiers are clearly from the Iraqi people! Bush said, "The Iraqis will love America for liberating them."
 
 
September/October 1994: Iraq threatens to end cooperation with UNSCOM, and starts deploying troops toward the Kuwaiti border.

July 1, 1995: After a long investigation, Iraq admits to the existence of an offensive biological weapons program.

June 1996: Iraq again denies UNSCOM teams access to sites under investigation. This results in U.N. Security Council Resolution 1060, demanding Iraq grant "immediate and unrestricted access" to all sites designated by UNSCOM.

I can list 300 more things like this. 300.
 
 
>>>Iraq did not have terrorist until America invaded Iraq!<<<

Except Abu Nidal, Abu Abbas, Abdul Yassin, and Abu Musab al-Zarqawi. (Some of the world's most wanted terrorists). Except the MEK and PKK.
 
 
I love it how the anti-Bush crowd tries to go against everything we're doing in Iraq, that they actually go against everything that has been known by the international community, and has been admitted by Saddam Hussein himself. It gets to the point where it looks like they're making a case to invade America, not Iraq.

"There's no terrorists in Iraq!"

Except some of the world's most wanted.
 
 
Where the hell is Jimmy? Jimmy why are you not ripping this Zarq creature a new asshole? LMAO Liberals never learn, they are still arguing the same lame arguments while we move forward militarily. NEWS FLASH my little liberal heathen: all the bitching in the world will not get Kerry elected in "04. Bush will have to die for that to happen.
 
 
Nah... OCA, if Bush died, Cheney would win.  
 
 
 
Originally posted by preemptingyou03
Nah... OCA, if Bush died, Cheney would win.  

 

This is true
 
 
Mohammed Atef, one of the three founders of al-Qaeda, wanted to go to Iraq to find chemical weapons, according to dozens of caught al-Qaeda members.

That right there, as well as Saddam's violations of war treaties, is cause for invasion.
 
 
 
Originally posted by spillmind
it's really kind of amazing to listen to this past age old philosphy in current motion. a perpetuation of an imposed violence, and one of quesitonable intent. given the circumstances, you can't really be suprised by something as horrific as this to happen? you don't even see our guys being blown to bits on a practically everyday basis!

this immense sudden hatred from the (mostly) war proponents is invariably telling about true intent of the occupation of iraq. i support a stronger international prescence in iraq for the greater of all the HUMANS in the area.

face it, our troops spend most of their time around the bases, largely due to the threat of agression! without a larger international presence and a saturation of the area with MORE prospecting contractors, and more emphasis on really rebuilding the country, this situation will continue into a tailspin as many predicted.

i'm not sure how we can do that or if it's even possible, but to assimilate a region you need to saturate it. with such a scant effort of mostly US troops, it's unlikely anything we hope for would take hold.

but I AM SURE where your hatred will get you. NOWHERE.

 

that is not the problem.the problem is islamic fundamentalism and an islamic society that is backwards and violent to everything that is not religiously acceptable to them.The only way the violence will stop around the world is if you take away all the korans which is the breeding ground for this kind of violence,but,since i believe in religious freedom this is not an option in my mind.contrary to what the media would have you believe islam is not a peaceful religion and these dumb asses would rather live in oppression and misery than accept the help of the great satan(the u.s.a.).Unless you didn't know we are a sovereign country and are able to deal with matters of national security without getting a permission slip from the u.n.Yeah sure france and spain along with the rest of the liberal socialist asses will help us if they can dictate how american law operates or what are foreign policy should be.france and the rest in the u.n. want to control our military,override our judicial system with a world court,end the death penalty,accept gay marriage,have us fund abortions overseas and have us pay the majority of the united nations bills.Where is the hatred in trying to free a people from an oppressive dictator and paying for that freedom in american blood?What exactly should we do to get the u.n. and those countries on board?
 
 
Spillmind, I do not have any justification or twisted view of the "Thou shalt not kill" commandmant. That is a true absolute moral commandment from God. It is wrong to kill period. As a side note, I do not believe in the death penalty (surprise you?). You agree, correct? We are left with a delema then, do we die or let the terrorists die? If someone was going to murder your wife or children and there was no way to save them except killing the intruder, what would you do?
I say we must fight evil, yes, we will be judged for it. All I can say is we are trying to save the Iraqi people and ourselves from any more torture or any chance of terrorist threats (direct or indirect). Is it perfectly right; no, it is the best we can do with the way the world is now.
I stated why I think they hate us already; where am I inconsistant?
Contrary to what you might assume about me I am willing to listen to your ideas. I've read your quotes from Hanh and Ueshike. They are wonderful to try for, they don't do too much toward saving your family when some poor Iraqi is trying to protect his family from some terrorist with an AK-47 pushed in his face and evil in their mind!!
Again, we are in Iraq, what do you, Spillmind, suggest? Your ideas would be appreciated?
I don't mind disscussing ideas with you, let's not get to the level of simple name calling! I'm not accusing you, let's keep it honest.
Thanks for your input.
 
 
 
Originally posted by st8_o_mind
This crap is very disturbing to me. I am hopeful that it is a reflection of adolescent bravado, not a serious attempt to advocate mass murder in retaliation of the brutal deaths of four Americans.

It never ceases to amaze me that the right-wing recoils in moral outrage at the concept of gay marriage, yet they are so completely morally bankrupt that calls to incinerate tens of thousands of innocent human beings is considered neither disgusting or perverse but cheered as patriotic.

It is likely that “Thou shall not kill” means little to the writer who clearly has no moral compass whatsoever. It is obvious to me that to advocate such mass violence and murder against the innocent no matter how just he or she feels their cause is, put the writer on exactly the same moral plane as the suicide bombers and 9/11 hijackers.

Such vile calls for mass murder should be condemned and denounced for what it is: Terrorism.

 

HEY ASSHOLE WHAT IF THAT HAD BEEN YOU,OR YOUR BEST FRIEND,OR YOUR SON.then you would probably feel outrage is warranted but since you are obviously either a iraq sympathizer or liberal jerk-off and probably a coward who never served a day of his life in the military let me explain how war works.

kill as many of the bad guys as you can(the more the better) while trying to limit the number of good guys dying to as few as possible.i'm glad i could help out.
 
 
Prre-O3, you make very excellent points. Thank you for the research, I learned quite a bit from you. Keep up the great work.
 
 
 
Originally posted by triggerfish
Spillmind, I do not have any justification or twisted view of the "Thou shalt not kill" commandmant. That is a true absolute moral commandment from God. It is wrong to kill period. As a side note, I do not believe in the death penalty (surprise you?). You agree, correct? We are left with a delema then, do we die or let the terrorists die? If someone was going to murder your wife or children and there was no way to save them except killing the intruder, what would you do?
I say we must fight evil, yes, we will be judged for it. All I can say is we are trying to save the Iraqi people and ourselves from any more torture or any chance of terrorist threats (direct or indirect). Is it perfectly right; no, it is the best we can do with the way the world is now.
I stated why I think they hate us already; where am I inconsistant?
Contrary to what you might assume about me I am willing to listen to your ideas. I've read your quotes from Hanh and Ueshike. They are wonderful to try for, they don't do too much toward saving your family when some poor Iraqi is trying to protect his family from some terrorist with an AK-47 pushed in his face and evil in their mind!!
Again, we are in Iraq, what do you, Spillmind, suggest? Your ideas would be appreciated?
I don't mind disscussing ideas with you, let's not get to the level of simple name calling! I'm not accusing you, let's keep it honest.
Thanks for your input.

 

For rulers are not a terror to good works,but to evil.Do you want to be unafraid of the authority?Do what is good,and you will have praise from the same.For he is God's minister to you for good.But if you do evil,be afraid;for he does not bear the sword in vain;for he is god's minister,an avenger to execute wrath on him who practices evil.therefore you must be subject,not only because of wrath but also for conscience' sake.for because of this you also pay taxes,for they are god's ministers attending continually to this very thing. romans 13:3-6
 
 
What do you think about bringing back the draft? I believe that every young man should serve at least 2 years. (minimum) in the military. This would accomplish several things: 1) Give our young men something positive to do after high school (a requirement by the way), 2) Get potential trouble makers off the street, thus reducing crime and alleviating the work load on the police, 3) Give these young men some positive training, sense of patriotism, and learn discipline (seriously needed), 4) Help to maintain our manpower levels we needed to fight this war on terror.
I know I am going to get hammered for this; let me have it! By the way, I served 4 years in the U.S.N. from 1972-1976 and was a Federal firefighter for 25 years (worked on military bases, loved it, miss it too). I wish I could sign up for the military again; alas, I am too old (50 years). I say remove the age limitation, I can aim a rifle and pull the trigger as well as the next man.
No, I'm not in a rush to kill anyone, I do want to serve my country again and help my young brave brothers and sisters in the military. I would like to give them a break as their life is just starting. May the Lord protect them all.
 
 
 
Originally posted by triggerfish
What do you think about bringing back the draft? I believe that every young man should serve at least 2 years. (minimum) in the military. This would accomplish several things: 1) Give our young men something positive to do after high school (a requirement by the way), 2) Get potential trouble makers off the street, thus reducing crime and alleviating the work load on the police, 3) Give these young men some positive training, sense of patriotism, and learn discipline (seriously needed), 4) Help to maintain our manpower levels we needed to fight this war on terror.
I know I am going to get hammered for this; let me have it! By the way, I served 4 years in the U.S.N. from 1972-1976 and was a Federal firefighter for 25 years (worked on military bases, loved it, miss it too). I wish I could sign up for the military again; alas, I am too old (50 years). I say remove the age limitation, I can aim a rifle and pull the trigger as well as the next man.
No, I'm not in a rush to kill anyone, I do want to serve my country again and help my young brave brothers and sisters in the military. I would like to give them a break as their life is just starting. May the Lord protect them all.

 

i also have thought of that and i think people in general would be different in a positive way if everyone served 2 years.
 
 
who cares probably all of bush's rich bitches done in FALLUJAH. How about us working class americans who don't make a million a year. My taxes went up $2,000 this year-wheres the tax break-my job is on the line because it's social services-this money monger who was appointed is nothing but a corporate narcissistic who is sending our children to their death in iraq to protect the money mongers in this country and the working class need to use their head. Anti-abortion bush so we have more soldiers to send somewhere to protect the money mongers and more people to employ at the minimum wage, nice guy, sure may he burn in hell.
 
 
 
do we die or let the terrorists die?

 

oh my oh my oh my. if only life were this simple, no? you think we are going to WIN this 'war on terror'...? how close are we to winning?

 
If someone was going to murder your wife or children and there was no way to save them except killing the intruder, what would you do?

 

wow! iraq was on the verge of this? i'd really be anxious to see what proof you've got of that.

 
I say we must fight evil, yes, we will be judged for it.

 

i say your prespective on what is 'evil' is horribly distorted, bias, and SERIOUSLY lacking in consistency.

 
All I can say is we are trying to save the Iraqi people and ourselves from any more torture or any chance of terrorist threats (direct or indirect). Is it perfectly right; no, it is the best we can do with the way the world is now.

 

by occupying and then IMPOSING our western way of 'democracy' on unwilling subjects? not only do i disagree with our methods, there is no future for iraqis! they are turning to private security because life there is dangerous. while our intent may be good, there are far to many factors that we DID NOT ANTICIPATE, or rather, CHOSE not to anticipate, and now we've got a big mess in iraq. damned peaceniks were right about what would happen if we tried to 'help' them!  

 
let's not get to the level of simple name calling!

 

apparently, you haven't read too many of my posts.

 
Again, we are in Iraq, what do you, Spillmind, suggest?

 

yes, we are there now, and let's all hope we LEARNED something from this all? personally, i think that we need to BOLSTER the amount of an INTERNATIONAL PRESCENCE, an occupying force that consists also of arab states to further promote cohesion. the iraqis don't trust americans (gee, i wonder why) and they are by and large the bulk of the occupation prescence. by integrating more countries, not only does it take a huge weight off of our shoulders (and our troops), but it would show that more than just the US is at least INTERESTED in seeing iraq succeed. bottom line is, without international support, the US cannot do it alone. PERIOD.

will we get that support? i doubt it. why? it's pretty obvious to me. do a little thinking, and it might come to you. and i'm glad you can see the light over that whole 'thou shall not kill' thing.  
 
 
Could some one out there answer this query??? Why do we have a corporate entity sitting there who appears to be manifesting symptoms of a narcissistic personality disorder? Why do I tag him as narcissistic? The following: (A pervasive pattern of grandiosity (in fantasy or behavior), need for admiration, and lack of empathy, beginning by early adulthood and present in a variety of contexts, as indicated by five (or more) of the following:
(1) Has a grandiose sense of self-importance (e.g., exaggerates achievements and talents, expects to be recognized as superior without commensurate achievements). Questionable National Guard service and mommy viewing him as Moses, his vision to bring democracy to the world, business success in Texas by utilizing eminent domain to build a baseball stadium, failure in the oil business.
(2) Is preoccupied with fantasies of unlimited success, power, and brilliance. I am the war president and will insure the safety of the United States fighting this war. What fighting, sending the middle class children out to face death in the name of invisible weapon of mass destruction.
(3) Believes that he or she is "special" and unique and can only be understood by, or should associate with, other special or high-status people (or institutions). Only addresses other Republicans, blocking others by constructing a barrier with busses, visits a window factory where his appearance is staged and after leaving nobody can be found working there, has a habit of addressing military personnel (I was in that situation during Viet Nam and ordered not to protest or publicly question the Commander and Chief or the war, and later worked in corrections (paramilitary institution also threatened that my job would be in jeopardy if I spoke about contrary issues to the department). Finally he is a born again Christian and assured of heaven while the rest of is of other denominations are domed to hell.
(4) Requires excessive admiration-need I say more.
(5) Has a sense of entitlement, i.e., unreasonable expectations of especially favorable treatment or automatic compliance with his or her expectations. Just observe what the regime did with the United Nations, France, Germany, and others that disagreed and their families were threatened.
(6) Is interpersonally exploitative, i.e., takes advantage of others to achieve his or her own ends-Our children in Iraq, middle class laborers with outclassing jobs, Enron, Medicare, soon to be Social Security, Etc,
(7) Lacks empathy: is unwilling to recognize or identify with the feelings and needs of others-Yes the compassionate president, if you happen to make $200, 000 a year and had to go to his preacher in order to understand how the average person manages.
(8) Shows arrogant, haughty behaviors or attitudes-Just watch him walking across the White House lawn, the smirk on his face during public appearances, comments like “bring them on”, etc.
 
 
 
What do you think about bringing back the draft? I believe that every young man should serve at least 2 years. (minimum) in the military. This would accomplish several things: 1) Give our young men something positive to do after high school (a requirement by the way), 2) Get potential trouble makers off the street, thus reducing crime and alleviating the work load on the police, 3) Give these young men some positive training, sense of patriotism, and learn discipline (seriously needed), 4) Help to maintain our manpower levels we needed to fight this war on terror.

 

BRING BACK THE DRAFT? and MAY THE LORD BLESS THEM ALL??!! you are seriously on the fringe, man! I'D LOVE TO SEE BUSH TRY TO BRING IT BACK, while his daughters puff herb amidst underage drinking. i wouldn't be suprised in the least if they even do coke! you think THEY will ever see battle? :rotflmao:
ok, this just getting to be too much! i've heard of people like this, but i can't believe each time i debate with one!

there is freedom of religion in this country, and i don't worship your god, so maybe i can't relate to your form of idealism. one that supports killing of innocent people for a 'greater good'. let's see that 'greater good', man. i'll bet you the 610 dead and thousands more dimembered or crippled for life would like to know, too! don't get me wrong, i'm all for the best possible outcome, but we've got to look at REALITY here. not some zealot's pipe dream.

 
For rulers are not a terror to good works,but to evil.Do you want to be unafraid of the authority?Do what is good,and you will have praise from the same.For he is God's minister to you for good.But if you do evil,be afraid;for he does not bear the sword in vain;for he is god's minister,an avenger to execute wrath on him who practices evil.therefore you must be subject,not only because of wrath but also for conscience' sake.for because of this you also pay taxes,for they are god's ministers attending continually to this very thing. romans 13:3-6

 

like i said, i don't subscribe to the american christianity, and i am proud of my freedom of religion. i don't tell you what to believe, nor would i hold you to my own ideals. i don't even blame you for disagreeing with me!
 
 
 
Originally posted by Palestinian Jew
Bush is the one that made the case for the war. If he hadn't brought it up, we wouldn't be there. I've heard what the dems have said many times and it sums up to pure partisanship.

Its also my opinion that Bush mislead the country with handpicked intelligence and I also believe that the CIA knew there weren't any WMD in Iraq especially when they know there were WMD in Libya.

 

Nope, WRONG!

Read the statements from the Dems about Saddam and WMD - they are mostly dated from 1998-2000!
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Iraq did not have terrorist until America invaded Iraq! The attacks on our soldiers are clearly from the Iraqi people! Bush said, "The Iraqis will love America for liberating them."

 

Are you on crack? Do you need to be bitchslapped with all the data about terrorist activity in Iraq for the past 20 years?  
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Bush has help Al Qaeda with its' recriutment.

 

Put up or shut up, where's the links to backup your PMS induced rants?
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Bottomline: Saddam did not have WMD since 1995 and Clinton had the factories bombed. Bush lied about the WMD! Bush knew he lied that is the reason for so many renaming of the invasion: 1. disarm Saddam; 2. Iraq had terrorists; 3. liberate the Iraqi people. Bush wanted to be a hero and, now, he looks like a fool!

 

If they weren't there since 95, then why did John Kerry, Joseph Lieberman, Hillary Clinton, Bill Clinton, Tom Daschle, Carl Levin, Madeline Albright, Nancy Pelosi, Bob Graham, Al Gore & Ted Kennedy make strong arguments for Saddam being in possession of these weapons? They made these statements between 1998-2002.

Lied my ass, you're just another deluded twit. You'll sit here and lay the blame on one single person while our entire government was saying the same damn thing for 5 years prior to the invasion.

The only fool here is you.
 
 
I've got two subjects to address. 1st the draft.

I am absoulutly for this. It has become a cancer in our society to hate the US and hate the Army. The Army is what provides citizens thier freedom. We have the liberties today becasue of the US armed forces. Every young adult should serve at least two years in the armed forces. those who wish to continue to serve may do so in 2 year blocks or they may serve 4 years in the Guard. With this many people in the Army we would be able to disperce forces across the world and never have a shortagge problem. Also i would say that the president reserves the right to declare a state of emergency to stay the enlistment indefinitaly or until he deems it nessisary to relaes the soldiers. I know many would oppose this act, mostly those tree huging hippies who couldn't do a day of service to save thier lives. And the lefists parents who belive war is BAD, or WRONG. Hell you know what I'll take this one step futher. Only soldiers are allowed to vote. If you serve you eran the right to vote, if you don't you don't get to vote. Let those who defend this land and it's ideals decide the direction it should go. now I know this is radical but i'm telling you the left will never allow this country to win this war. The left will pull us out of Iraq the secound they get a chance. The international community has no army, the US is the international comunities army. Let the left serve along with the right, then we shall see how patriot the left becomes, the hate americans or blame americans first will leave this country because they will be scared to serve, and let me be the first to say...Good ridence to bad rubbish. Also for those who think i'm just some kid, who won't serve i am in the army and i do serve. I made the choice to sacrifice my time and life for my country, why don't you?

2nd.
Shadow what the hell are you talking about? Not all republicans are millionaires. If your job is in trouble re-train. The Govt. has programs to help you with that. Don't be lazy, quit blamming Bush for your problems. We are not Europe or Canada. It is a personal responsability economy. You chose the field you work in and now the field is declineing. The Govt. should not be responsible for making sure you have a job. That is your responsibilty.
 
 
Preemptingyou, I quit reading your links when I noticed that most of them were citing Mr. Powell's speech, which he has said was total bunk. Those 200,000 Iraqi police signed up for money. What did they do in Fallujah? Run.
 
 
 
Originally posted by shadow 04
who cares probably all of bush's rich bitches done in FALLUJAH. How about us working class americans who don't make a million a year. My taxes went up $2,000 this year-wheres the tax break-my job is on the line because it's social services-this money monger who was appointed is nothing but a corporate narcissistic who is sending our children to their death in iraq to protect the money mongers in this country and the working class need to use their head. Anti-abortion bush so we have more soldiers to send somewhere to protect the money mongers and more people to employ at the minimum wage, nice guy, sure may he burn in hell.

 

First, Please try to string your words together in a way that are comprehendable to mortals not gifted with the gift of translation.

Second, Why on earth would anyone go to hell for opposing the murder of Innocent children?

As for the other posts on the draft. I am not sure how i think of this. It would be good if the young had more respect for our military and what they do. but im not sure drafting them is the best way to do it. For one, i dont think we should dilute the effectiveness of the military by putting people who dont want to be there in it. Part of what makes our force so strong is that its volenteer.
 
 
Retrain! I'm 60 been an associate psychologist for 39 years, worked with forensic patients in the correctional setting, viet nam vets with post traumatic syndrome, served in the army. This narcissistic figure head can't lick my booths-Bush. My daddy isn't out on his sail boat or the golf course or I'm not one of the privaleged. If your not one of them then you are a fool or a masochist and are being lead to the slaughter like a sheep.
 
 
 
Originally posted by shadow 04
Retrain! I'm 60 been an associate psychologist for 39 years, worked with forensic patients in the correctional setting, viet nam vets with post traumatic syndrome, served in the army. This narcissistic figure head can't lick my booths-Bush. My daddy isn't out on his sail boat or the golf course or I'm not one of the privaleged. If your not one of them then you are a fool or a masochist and are being lead to the slaughter like a sheep.

 

Boy are you going to be in a world of shit for the next 4 years  
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA
Where the hell is Jimmy? Jimmy why are you not ripping this Zarq creature a new asshole? LMAO Liberals never learn, they are still arguing the same lame arguments while we move forward militarily. NEWS FLASH my little liberal heathen: all the bitching in the world will not get Kerry elected in "04. Bush will have to die for that to happen.

 

I'm back buddy! Had some dinner plans this evening.

Yes, Zarq is just another ill informed, clueless Bush hater. She has made it abundantly clear from her very first post that she has absolutely no idea what she is speaking about. She makes ludicrous statements and refuses to back them up in any way.

And yes, the arguments are lame. Rest easy though, the rest of the country doesn't subscribe to moveon.org as so many of these drooling tinfoil hat wearers do.

Debate on facts alone and the diehard liberals will choke on their own drool. They would much rather argue their conspiracy theories and then cry foul when you present facts. They claim Bush lied over and over and over and over - yet not one of them can prove a damn thing. They claim Bush lied about WMD, yet practically the entire democratic party made identical statements - BEFORE Bush even took office. Of course, that is always conveniently ignored.

Sadly, you'll have to get used to their foot stomping and whining. I'm afraid they'll be doing more of the same until 2008.
 
 
 
Originally posted by shadow 04
Retrain! I'm 60 been an associate psychologist for 39 years, worked with forensic patients in the correctional setting, viet nam vets with post traumatic syndrome, served in the army. This narcissistic figure head can't lick my booths-Bush. My daddy isn't out on his sail boat or the golf course or I'm not one of the privaleged. If your not one of them then you are a fool or a masochist and are being lead to the slaughter like a sheep.

 

i'm not a child of privalage and I'm not a "mssochist" either. I am a 21 year old college student who is in the army. i am a republican because i see what the left has done to this country and to the world. Socialism and liberalism(the kinds in europe and america) are ruining the fabric of this great nation. We are the most powerful nation in the world. We have the obligation to ensure ourway of life continues and the European way of life continues. Inorder to do that we have to fight wars, kill people dispose dictators. It's called Pan-America, the same as Pan-Britaina, or Pan-Roman. The powerful lead, the powerful dictate to the weak. It has happened since the begining of time and when we finally fall of our great pedistal whoever followes will dictate the world policy. That's how it works. I will not appolagise for americas greatness, I will not appoligize for Bush's awesome leadership in this horrible time. I will not appoligize for peace through war. I am not a peace nik and i am not a coward!!!!
 
 
I should have put up a laugh smilie when I wrote that Jimmy. I had the scene from Full Metal Jacket in my head where Private Pyle is in the john with the semi auto and the drill sargeant is yelling "why are you not stomping his guts out?! Lolllll
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA
I should have put up a laugh smilie when I wrote that Jimmy. I had the scene from Full Metal Jacket in my head where Private Pyle is in the john with the semi auto and the drill sargeant is yelling "why are you not stomping his guts out?! Lolllll

 

Excellent movie, loved every second of it!

I'd like to pull a private pyle on some of these posters! :firing:
 
 
 
Originally posted by jimnyc
Excellent movie, loved every second of it!

I'd like to pull a private pyle on some of these posters! :firing:

 

       
 
 
 
Originally posted by jimnyc
Excellent movie, loved every second of it!

I'd like to pull a private pyle on some of these posters! :firing:

 

Don't worry my friend, i've got a feeling that on the first Tuesday in November we'll have to put out a suicide watch on our house liberals  
 
 
Come get me jim,       :bat: :chains: :firing: :2guns:    
 
 
 
Originally posted by Palestinian Jew
Come get me jim

 

When I refer to the drooling liberals, understand I am referring to the freaks who thrive on nothing more than conspiracies. Those that can't go 2 posts without blaming all the worlds problems on Bush. And those that act like they just had a broom handle shoved up their ass when you have the audacity to provide facts to the debate.

My friend, we disagree on a lot, but you've got far to go before I see you in that light.

You're still the enemy though.  
 
 
I didn't know you were talking about those foaming at the mouth liberals who I hate probably as much or more than you do just because they make the left look bad, so continue on and we'll wage our war later.
 
 
 
Originally posted by kcmcdonald
Is Isreal not an allie?

 

Israel is a country full of people who don't deserve to have a country of their own. I never saw the point of giving them one.

 
Saddam supported terror, end of story. Bush doctrine states that he is open to attack.

 

Justifying Bush's actions with Bush's own doctrine. Great job, moron.

 

 
I am absoulutly for this. It has become a cancer in our society to hate the US and hate the Army.

 

Aaaaaaaawww... The people don't respect you because you let the military pay for your education while you hang out there playing the tough guy? How about you actually accomplish something in life? People will start to respect you. Dumbass.

 
I know many would oppose this act, mostly those tree huging hippies who couldn't do a day of service to save thier lives.

 

Can you please enlighten me on the great and brave things you've done in the military so far? Oh, there are none? That's what I thought. F%$@ing loser. Come back and talk about how you "served your country in the military" when you've been in a real war. Yes, a REAL war. Not some "1 soldier per day dies" pussy turf war. You'd piss your pants and drop your weapons the moment you're confronted with an enemy soldier anyway.

And don't tell me about all the great and heroic things you're going to do when the time comes. Until you've done them, that's worth shit.

 
Only soldiers are allowed to vote. If you serve you eran the right to vote, if you don't you don't get to vote. Let those who defend this land and it's ideals decide the direction it should go.

 

     

How about spending less time as a tool and starting to think for yourself? Until you can do that, you shouldn't be allowed to decide anyone's fate. But considering that you're not much of a leader but rather a follower, I doubt that you'll have much important things to decide in the future anyway.

 
americans first will leave this country because they will be scared to serve

 

     

For someone like you, who's probably been beaten up in high school all the time for his lunch money, I can imagine that "serving in the military" helps to rebuild some self-esteem. But if you're honest, you'll admit that there really isn't much to it. You won't get instant respect just because you put on the uniform, except from your fellow tools.

 
I made the choice to sacrifice my time and life for my country

 

You sacrificed your life? Wow! How can you still post here? But I'm sure you have been in countless life-threatening situations during your glorious service in the military...

 
i am a republican because i see what the left has done to this country and to the world.

 

Oh, no! The end of the world is near! Thanks for pointing that out, I wouldn't have noticed otherwise.

 
I am not a peace nik and i am not a coward!!!!

 

You may not be a "peace nik", but I'm pretty sure you're a coward.
 
 
 
Originally posted by OCA
Congratulations sweet cheeks, you are talking to somebody who has done time in a military unit(albeit in the Greek army) but still more than your taxpayer junket ass.

 

Congrats on (a) wasting your country's money instead of getting a real job like most smart people and (b) spending some quality time as a lowly servant because you're too cowardly to do real work. Guess that proves how qualified you are to call other people cowards. Moron.

 
Is being a complete pacifist pussy part of being an American too? I'm 100% Cretan, look up our history and find out what actual warriors are like.

 

More like 100% cretin, judging from your inane ramblings here. Maybe someone should introduce you to the concept of individuality, since you obviously seem to think that you're some kind of brave warrior because at some point in history someone who incidentally had the same nationality as you won a battle. Get a clue, kid. And considering how you got your asses handed to you in WW2, there's probably not much left of your "warrior genes".

Why don't you go back to f#@$ing Greece or whatever shithole you crawled out from? You're not American anyway.

 
 
 
 
Originally posted by calmdown
Why don't you go back to f#@$ing Greece or whatever shithole you crawled out from? You're not American anyway.

 

Welcome to the board. Now go fuck yourself, loser.
 
 
 
Originally posted by Sir Evil
Not gonna last too long here with your attitude and lack of brains!!  

 

Ummm, you're too late. He's been put out in the streets with the rest of the monkey felchers.
 
 
 
Originally posted by Sir Evil
  Damn, and I thought it was me with the itchy trigger finger!

 

I don't have much of a tolerance for stupid people.
 
 
Dammit the wife wanted me to go to bed early last night, wink wink  , I would've loved to have a go at that this example of an abortion that should've happened.

If he can still view the boards this for him. Read history asshole! Crete was the only part of Greece that did not get occupied by the Nazis despite almost daily bombings numbnuts. Intellectual fucking charletain you are!

Direct quote from Winston Churchill:
"today we shall not say that Greeks fight like heroes but rather heroes fight like Greeks"

Ignorant pile of dogshit moron, blow yourself!

Sorry about the language but is appropriate for lowlife scum like this.
 
 
missed it,
god that guy was a dick. Where the hell did he come from? Oh well I think that set a record for the fewest posts I've seen before someone got the boot.

For you calmdown,
Peace Biatch:p:
 
 
Bush has caused a loss of our Nation's credibility. Had Bush taken a more aggressive approach in Afghanistan, instead of paying large sums of money to tribal war lords to do the job for us, we might have blocked some of the terrorists subsequent activities around the world.

Opinions from The Greenville News.
 
 
 
Originally posted by zarquiekia
Bush has caused a loss of our Nation's credibility. Had Bush taken a more aggressive approach in Afghanistan, instead of paying large sums of money to tribal war lords to do the job for us, we might have blocked some of the terrorists subsequent activities around the world.

Opinions from The Greenville News.

 

We won the war in Afgan, we're winning the war in Iraq, we winnning and we're going to win the war on terror. Quit trying to subvert the rest of the population into surrendering. I know 9-11 was just to much for you guys on the left. It's OK just let the right finnish the job and you'll be back to sunshine and flowers in no time. Hey the war will be over even quicker if you guys just vote for Bush and ignore the "internationalist" Kerry.
 
 
Spillmiind, we are not going to agree on much of anything. It was apparant that you did not believe in God from what I have read. That is your right. Forgive me if I am wrong. I submit that you take what I say in a convoluted way. I do not think you answer my questions directly but by twisting the intent of my question or you do not see the connection I make at all. Oh, I 'm sure you will say I'm wacked and make no sense, so be it. Sadly I don't think we are really communicating, although I am still willing to try.
Let's try one more time. I asked you what would you do if somone threatened your wife with death ((by the way, I think those things happened once or twice in Iraq), what would you do? Well, what would you do? Do you get the connection? It refers to the fact that there are situations where someone is going to die, you or them, choose!
Do you blame the U.S.A. for the pain and suffering of this world? Are we the cause of all the problems? If you believe this, I ask you again, what do you suggest?
 
 
KC, I agree with you. You bring up some great points. I wrote a similiar post concerning the draft. Keep strong!
 
 
Payback? We got our butts kicked in this last attack!. I believe we must attack from the air as I stated previously. I think that the polititians may be pressing the field commanders to limit their actions to prevent too much collateral damage. If this is the case the "collateral" damage will be on our side. If this keeps going like this it will be a battle of attrition, the terrorists will win this one by sheer numbers. In my opinion we had better try soething different, but they won't. I have a real bad feeling about this very critical point in the war on terror.
I understand that during the war we did not "secure" Fallujah. Is it possible that Saddam planned this, had his fighters group here, save their weapons, manpower and plan until the time is right? They set the trap, we fall in and now we are caught.
I want us to win, I want the innocent Iraqis to be spared, I want the Iraqis to have their country back as a peaceful nation. I feel the potential for an all out civil war. If that happens we will have to either put them down hard or back out, completely!
I hope I am wrong. O.K. Spillmind, tell me how wacked I am. Oh, just for you; there are more nations there than just us and British. I believe there are something like 50-60 nations helping. Not nough for you?
 
 
Bloody Joss! I can't believe the number of intellectually challenged, grammatically challenged, and emotionally disturbed people around here this afternoon.

Shadow-
I'm speechless. I read your posts several times, but I couldn't figure out whether you are stoned or have recently suffered a severe head injury. If it's the latter, I am sorry & wish you well.

Remember- See the comma, touch the comma, BE...... THE COMMA!

St8-

"We are as bad as the highjackers?"
Look, I know you are pissed that the Dean blog is gone, but I am sure that things will get better. I feel sad that you really believe that garbage. However, this is the reason you guys are losing the war of ideas....because you HAVE none. Well, except for extreme, fringe slogans. I guess you feel that we shouldn't have even gone into Afghanistan to defend ourselves, right?

Hey, I know what would get you behind us killing terrorists:

Instead of saying we "killed" the terrorists," we'll just say we performed "post-birth abortion procedures" on them. Maybe, we can even get NARAL to contribute to the effort.

Calmdown-

Ummm, the short bus is leaving...........Run, little fella, RUUUUUUN!

Trigger-

Actually, I did once back a liberal into the "would you kill an intruder to save your family from rape & murder" corner. Even I was blown away when he said, "No, I would let all of us die."
They would much rather we just take attack after attack, never defending ourselves, just as they would watch their daughters & wives raped & have their throats slit. As I told him, you are a disgrace to both manhood AND humanity.

Oh, and for all of these people who say that maybe we should look inside and figure out why the terrorists hate us in the first place.

Ummmm, NEWSFLASH!
WE DON'T GIVE A FU*K! All that we care about is killing every single one of them before they kill us.

See, kiddies, these people are lunatics & thugs, nothing more. They only cloak themselves in a religious ideology in order to try & fool people into buying that their violence & mass murder are somehow justified. That their hatred of America is easily rationalized. You, my friends, simply bought their lies because you are idiotic suckers for ANY & ALL reasoning for hating America & its culture.

The draft should NEVER be brought back! Christ, does the military want some of THESE crazy fu*ks with guns? They would probably start shooting our real soldiers in their backs.

Also, about members of the military: Liberals believe that they are cogs in some machine. Well, they're right....THE MACHINE WHICH ALLOWS YOU PUNK-ASS BITCHES TO WHINE, PROTEST, AND SLEEP SAFELY AT NIGHT!
You WANT them on that wall! You NEED them on that wall.

I love how liberals love to call Bush dumb.

First off, I love the "new" word "strategery," and I have even gotten others to start using it. I mean, if Al Gore can lie about creating the Internet, discovering Love Canal, being the inspiration for "Love Story," and, even above communism- when it wasn't a punchline- & terrorism, insist that the greatest threat to the world is a Saturn, then I believe that W. can invent a new word. Also, when you guys call Bush dumb, please, just preface your slurs by admitting that Bush is more intelligent than either Bill Bradley or Al Gore. Whether it be college entrance exams or the actual college grades, Bush is either their equal or superior. And don't forget how Bush bitchslapped Gore in their debates. I know you guys are still sore that your attempt to steal Florida didn't work- after THREE attempts- but you must move on.

Now, liberals move on to say that tens of thousands- or hundreds of thousands- of innocent Iraqis have & will die. As always, they never source because their stats are a complete fraud. It's just that liberals are never questioned about their numbers & facts by their cohorts in the liberal mass media, explaining why they get so hysterical & incredulous when WE question them over their stats, and, even more, when we ask them to source.

In 1998, the Clinton administration & Congress passed a resolution calling for regime change in Iraq, yet they were never willing to back it up with any force, thus proving that liberals believe in symbolism over substance, intent over results. When Bush finally called "Time Up" on Iraq, after SEVENTEEN U.N. Resolutions, they screamed," Hey! How dare you! We didn't mean to ACTUALLY change Sadam's Iraq regime, we just wanted to feel better about ourselves!" LMFAO
Ah, silly liberals.

By following their "too many soldiers & Iraqis have died and we must leave" diatribe to its illogical conclusion, we would have never defeated the Japanese & Nazis, being that it took several YEARS & hundreds of thousands of American/allied lives to accomplish this epic task.

Liberals are very bitter, petty people. They live on hatred & clear their throats with epithets, lies, & slurs.

All we TRUE Americans can do is hope that, one fine day soon, they choke on their hate!

I have a feeling that their day of demise will be November 2nd, 2004.
 
 
I haven't a clue how this is going to end up in Iraq. I do know it's not a Vietnam, though I doubt it's post D-day Germany. Shit to tell, it's a mess, not a quagmire, but nonetheless a mess.

Think we need to take out the Sadr guy, yet let the remaining Iraqis decide their fate. ? Shit.
 
 
I hope Rummy and Co. have some grand plan that we aren't aware of........

Fallujah: Why didn't we cut off the power, water, food supply, etc and tell these f**kers to give up the a-holes and disarm in 24 hours or we're going to rain hell down upon them. A couple of MOAB's and a few AC-130's maybe? It just seems that we are so concerned about "collateral damage".... All that Thou shalt not Kill stuff? Sorry I'd rather kill then be killed. Same goes for our troops. They are there now and they need to be able to fight with both hands.

Al-Sadr: It would be nice if the Shia's would give him up to us on their own. If this doesn't happen we need to take him out, but expect the firestorm of shit that's going to follow, and be ready to
put his fanatic followers down, once and for all.

My Opinion (I know everyones got one   ):

The case has undoubtably been made as to why we should have invaded Iraq on paper (300+ resolutions, history, etc) In the big picture it makes sense. Unfortunatley, there are serious questions that need answered.

Saddam had WMD's. Where are they now? Can he possibly have hid them that well? Personally I think they are in Syria. There is no way Clinton took them all out in 1998. The whole arguement that the libs and Bush haters make on this subject is bogus. They've already decided that they didn't/don't exist and all they can say is "He lied, He lied, He lied" blah blah blah. It is a known fact that they do in fact exist, but the "where" question needs to be answered.

The whole bring in the UN debate is pointless. They have proven to be spineless and corrupt. (Its a shame that the American media is so biased that they do not report on the absolutley scandalous Oil for Food program) What do they bring to the table in getting Iraq on its feet? Expertise? Look at how well they have handled the various situations in Africa in the last decade. Can you say Rawaanda? Somalia? Sudan? Congo? Their record is pathetic.

We need to take the gloves off. If the polls are to be believed, the Iraqis know they are better off then they were under Hussein & co. The majority seem to be optimistic about the future. But how long will that last if we can't get past the current situation decisivley (sp?)?

The US government doesn't give us (the general population) enough credit. We know war is hell. Whether you agree on the need to be in Iraq or not is a moot point now. I would rather the world shake its head at us for killing too many people then letting this insurgency BS going on much longer. We invaded, we need to conquer. Period. If all we (the general public) see and hear is how bad things are going, people will begin to lose sight of what our goals are. It seems like the people I talk to want this over with, but as a victory. We need to attain that at all costs. At this point I really don't care how the French or the Egyptians or anybody else feels.

Who are we handing the country over to in 2 months? Is there really a plan in place or are we going to just "wing it" like we seem to be doing with so many other things?

I would just hate to think that we are going about this 1/2 assed. There is no turning back. War was declared on us. We win or we die.

Thanks for letting me rant....
 
 
don't worry as long as Bush is in office this war will continue and no matter the costs we will win. Because we can, and becasue we must!!!!!
 
 
We must know though it is more than Bush! Bush is doing a great job of fighting it and he's doing a great job for writing the strategy for it, but it'll continue in 2009. It'll continue after Iraq is free. It'll continue after Osama's captured.

It will end with the slow change from radicalism to tolerance and democracy.

But we must fight it! With or without Bush!
 
 
Keep the Republicans in office and will win this thing. This war cannot be won by a playcatting UN. It will be won by force then diplomacy.
 
 
You have it right! Great points and for supporting what is right. It is true, we will never get through to the liberals. I believe that we have a greater capacity to look at problems from several points of view and come up with the most logical and compassionate solution. Oh I know I will get pounded for saying that we are compassionate but they can't see the big picture.
Keep up the great work you two!
 
 
